Utah statutes.
58-73-602.   Division regulation -- Quality of care -- Complaints.

(1)  To enable the division and the board to license applicants for licensure and regulate individuals licensed under this chapter, the division and board shall endeavor to obtain information concerning the quality and adequacy of chiropractic care rendered to patients.

(2)  Chiropractic physicians licensed under this chapter shall furnish information requested by the division on recommendation of the board.

(3) (a)  The board shall designate committees composed of chiropractic physicians licensed by this state to advise the division and the board regarding the quality and adequacy of chiropractic care rendered to patients by chiropractic physicians licensed under this chapter and to recommend the division initiate investigations on chiropractic physicians who may be acting in violation of this chapter.

(b)  If it appears to the committee there is reasonable cause to believe that a chiropractic physician licensed under this chapter has failed to provide adequate chiropractic care to patients, a complaint shall be made to the division outlining the statement of reasonable cause.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 253, 1996 General Session

